New Jersey, session 222, A4173.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  There is created in the Department of Veterans Affairs a Veterans Affairs Oversight Board.  The board shall be responsible for the oversight of: (1) all veteran service officers; (2) each board, council, commission, program, and such similar entity, within the Department of Veterans Affairs; and (3) all programs, benefits, and services provided specifically to military service members, veterans, and their families by any State Executive Branch department, division, commission, or agency. b.    The board shall consist of the head of each veteran 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(19) tax-exempt organization under the Internal Revenue Code operating in the State, or a designee. c.  The heads of the American Legion Department of New Jersey, the Disabled American Veterans Department of New Jersey, and the Department of New Jersey Veterans of Foreign Wars, or their designees, shall serve as co-chairs for the first three meetings.  By the conclusion of the third meeting, the members of the board shall vote to elect a chair and vice-chair.  The chair and vice-chair elected by a majority vote of the members of the board shall serve for a term of three years. d.  For the performance of its work, the board may request and avail itself of and utilize the service of any officer or employee of the Department of Veterans Affairs who shall render such assistance as the board may require without additional compensation. e.  Each member of the board shall be entitled to be reimbursed for reasonable traveling and other expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of their duties.  In addition, each member shall receive a per diem allowance of $1,000 for each monthly meeting of the board attended, provided, however, that no member shall in any case receive per diem compensation as such member in an amount in excess of $12,000 for any one calendar year. f.  The board shall establish procedures for the conduct of its meetings and activities. 2.  a.  The board shall meet once in each calendar month, but no less than 11 such monthly meetings per calendar year.  The failure of a member of the board to participate in a minimum of one monthly meeting every eight months shall result in removal of that board member.  The member shall be replaced by another representative from the same organization. b.  The board may hold such additional meetings as it may deem necessary and appropriate. A meeting of the board may be called by the chair or by a majority of its members, and a majority of the entire authorized membership of the board shall constitute a quorum at any meeting thereof. c.  The board may hold public meetings and hearings at such places and at such times as it shall designate, at which it may solicit the testimony of interested persons, groups, and the general public. 3.  a.  (1)  Each Executive Branch department, division, commission, and agency that provides programs, benefits, and services specifically for military service members, veterans, and their families shall appoint a liaison to the board.  The liaison shall not be a member of the board, but shall act as the point of contact to the board. (2)  Each Executive Branch department, division, commission, and agency that provides programs, benefits, and services specifically to military service members, veterans, and their families shall provide a biannual report to the board.  The report shall describe in detail such programs, benefits, and services provided to military service members, veterans, and their families, the number of persons assisted, plans to expand to reach additional military service members, veterans, and their families, and such other information deemed necessary and appropriate by the board. (3)  Each Executive branch department, division, commission, and agency that provides programs, benefits, and services specifically to military service members, veterans, and their families, including the Department of Veterans Affairs, shall annually present to the board that portion of their State and federal, if applicable, budget that represents those programs, benefits, and services. b.  (1)  Each board, council, commission, and such similar entity, within the Department of Veterans Affairs shall appoint a liaison to the board.  The liaison shall not be a member of the board, but shall act as the point of contact to the board. (2)  Each board, council, commission, and such similar entity, within the Department of Veterans Affairs shall provide a biannual report to the board.  The report shall describe in detail such programs, benefits, and services provided to military service members, veterans, and their families, the number of persons assisted, plans to expand to reach additional military service members, veterans, and their families, and such other information deemed necessary and appropriate by the board. The department shall, upon request and when available, provide copies of the reports of the contractors relating to military mission maintenance and growth, subject to the provisions of P.L.1963, c.73 (C.47:1A-1 et seq.). c.  Each liaison shall attend the monthly meetings of the board, and shall attend no less than 10 monthly meetings per year.  The failure of a liaison to participate in a minimum of one monthly meeting every 10 months shall result in removal of that liaison.  The liaison shall be replaced by another employee who shall serve as liaison. 4.  a.  The responsibilities of the board shall be to coordinate and implement a strategic plan to ensure military service members, veterans, and their families are made aware of the programs, benefits, and services available to them, and to ensure that all State departments, divisions, commissions, and agencies are effectively delivering programs, benefits, and services that are comprehensive to military service members, veterans, and their families in this State. It shall be the duty of the board to conduct an analysis of the various programs, benefits and services provided by the State specifically to military service members, veterans, and their families, and to evaluate those programs, benefits, and services to assess their effectiveness. The board shall also analyze and evaluate with regard to veterans who reside in the State: accessibility of the programs, benefits, or services; educational, occupational training, employment, and business opportunities; physical and behavioral health and long-term health care options; criminal justice issues; housing opportunities and homelessness; and special needs as determined by the board. b.  The board shall provide a report detailing the strategic plan based upon comprehensive data acquired through engagement with State departments, divisions, commissions, and agencies, and military service members, veterans, and their families. c.     The board shall develop recommendations to be submitted to the Governor and the Legislature to address any deficiencies in the provision of programs, benefits and services specifically to military service members, veterans, and their families in this State.  The recommendations shall address specifically whether the existing State programs, benefits, and services are adequate to meet the existing needs of military service members, veterans, and their families; are being used to fulfill objectives in a manner that complements and leverages State, federal, and private resources; and how they may more effectively serve all current and future military service members, veterans, and their families in the State. d.  All reports of the board shall be posted on the website of the Department of Veterans Affairs. 5.  The board shall prepare and submit a report to the Governor, and the Legislature pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), within nine months of the organizational meeting of the board.  Thereafter, the board shall prepare and submit annual reports to the Governor and the Legislature containing its findings, activities, and recommendations, including any recommendations for administrative and legislative action that it deems appropriate. 6.  The Commissioner of the Department of Veterans Affairs shall include in the annual budget request of the Department of Veterans Affairs a request for sufficient funds to effectuate the purposes of this act, P.L.   , c.   (C.   )(pending before the Legislature as this bill). 7.  This act shall take effect on the first day of the third month next following enactment, except that the Commissioner of the Department of Veterans Affairs may take any anticipatory administrative action in advance as shall be necessary for the implementation of this act.